Arkansas, session 2025, HB1353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-85-132 is amended to read as follows:
23-85-132. Reduction of benefits due to other insurance contracts
prohibited.
(a) No A contract of individual accident and health insurance or
health coverage sold, delivered, or issued for delivery or offered for sale
in this state by an insurer, hospital and medical service corporation, or
health maintenance organization, directly or indirectly providing indemnity
services, healthcare services, or cash to an individual as a result of
hospitalization, medical or surgical treatment, or dental care, or vision
care shall not contain a provision reducing the benefit that would otherwise
be payable to the individual in the absence of other insurance or health
coverage if the reduction of benefits is due solely to the existence of one
*ANS200*
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
(1) or more additional contracts providing benefits to that individual unless
the reduction complies with coordination of benefit rules adopted by the
Insurance Commissioner.
(b) No A contract of individual accident and health insurance sold,
delivered, or issued for delivery or offered for sale in this state providing
disability income coverage shall not contain any a provision for the denial
or reduction of benefits because of the existence of other insurance, except
as provided in § 23-85-122 or any coverages approved by the commissioner
pursuant thereto and except that the benefits may be reduced to offset
disability income benefits payable under the Social Security Act.
(c) The commissioner may issue rules to implement this section,
including, but not limited to, without limitation rules as to the amount of
reductions and the nature and timing of proofs of eligibility for Social
Security benefits.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1002 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1002. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Covered materials" means materials for which reimbursement
from the insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care
discount plan is provided to a vision care provider by an individual's vision
benefit plan or contract and that are reimbursable subject to a deductible,
copayment, coinsurance, or other contractual limitations;
(2) "Covered services" means services for which reimbursement
from the insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care
discount plan is provided to a vision care provider by an individual's vision
benefit plan or contract and that are reimbursable subject to a deductible,
copayment, coinsurance, or other contractual limitations;
(3) "Enrollee" means an individual participating in a health
benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan that is
purchased by an individual or provided to an individual by an insurer,
company, organization, group, employer, government assistance program, or
another entity that purchases or supplies coverage for a health benefit plan,
vision care benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan;
(4) "Extrapolation" means a mathematical formula, process, or
technique used by a vision benefit manager or the vision benefit manager's
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
agent, in an audit of an optometrist to estimate audit results or findings
for a larger batch or group of claims not reviewed by the vision benefit
manager;
(5) "Insurer" means an insurance company, a health maintenance
organization, a hospital and medical service corporation, or a self-insured
health plan for employees of a governmental entity;
(4)(6) "Materials" means ophthalmic devices, including without
limitation:
(A) Lenses;
(B) Devices containing lenses;
(C) Contact lenses;
(D) Artificial intraocular lenses;
(D)(E) Ophthalmic frames;
(E)(F) Lens-mounting apparatus;
(F)(G) Prisms;
(G)(H) Spectacle or contact lens treatments and coatings;
and
(H)(I) Prosthetic devices to correct, relieve, or treat
defects or abnormal conditions of the human eye or its adnexa;
(J) Low-vision devices; and
(K) Vision therapy devices;
(5)(7) "Noncovered materials" means materials that are not
covered by an insurer, a vision benefit manager, a vision care plan, or a
vision care discount plan;
(6)(8) "Noncovered services" means services that are not covered
by an insurer, a vision benefit manager, a vision care plan, or a vision care
discount plan;
(7)(9) "Participating provider agreement" means an agreement
between a vision care provider and an insurer that obligates a vision care
provider to provide for compensation services and materials to an individual
who is insured by the insurer;
(8)(10) "Services" means benefits or services provided by a
vision care provider;
(9)(11) "Vision benefit manager" means an individual, company,
organization, group, or other entity, including without limitation an
insurer, third party administrator, and a subcontractor, that creates,
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
promotes, sells, provides, advertises, or administers an integrated or stand-
alone vision benefit plan, vision benefit discount plan, or other insurance
policy or contract that provides vision benefits or discounts to an enrollee
pertaining to the provision of covered services or covered materials;
(12) "Vision benefit plan or contract" means a plan, contract,
or policy of insurance issued by an insurer that provides for vision care
benefits, materials, or services;
(10)(13) "Vision care discount plan" means a separate plan to
provide benefits or services under a rider to a health benefit plan or as a
stand-alone agreement that is authorized by a vision care provider to provide
discounts to individuals under the Primary Eye Care Provider Act, § 23-99-301
et seq.;
(11)(14) "Vision care plan" means an entity that provides health
benefits and that creates, promotes, sells, provides, advertises, or
administers an integrated or stand-alone vision benefit plan or contract; and
(12)(15) "Vision care provider" means an individual licensed as
an optometrist under § 17-90-301 et seq., or a licensed osteopathic or
medical physician licensed under § 17-91-101 et seq. or § 17-95-401 et seq.,
if the physician has also completed a residency in ophthalmology.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1003 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-1003. Prohibited practices — Agreements.
(a) A participating provider agreement between an insurer, vision
benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan and a vision
care provider shall not establish a fee that a vision care provider shall
charge for services or materials that are not covered by a vision benefit
plan or contract.
(b) A vision care provider shall not charge a fee for services or
materials that is more than the vision care provider's normal rate for the
services or materials if the services or materials are noncovered services or
noncovered materials.
(c)(1) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall not require a vision care provider to apply a
discount to an individual who is insured by the insurer with a participating
vision care provider for noncovered services or noncovered materials.
(2) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
vision care discount plan shall not avoid the restriction under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section by providing minimal reimbursement for a service or
materials to apply a discount.
(d) A reimbursement paid by an insurer, vision benefit manager, vision
care plan, or vision care discount plan to a vision care provider for covered
services and covered materials shall not be:
(1) Nominal or de minimis; or
(2) Less than the current calendar year Medicare reimbursement
rate for the covered service or covered materials provided to the enrollee.
(e) A participating provider agreement between an insurer, vision
benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan and a vision
care provider shall not require that a vision care provider participate with
or be credentialed by any specific vision care plan or vision care discount
plan as a condition to join an insurer's provider panel.
(e)(f) A participating provider agreement between an insurer, vision
benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan and a vision
care provider shall not restrict or limit, directly or indirectly, the vision
care provider's choice of optical labs or choice of sources and suppliers of
services or materials provided by the vision care provider to an individual
who is insured by the insurer.
(g) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall identify participating vision care providers in a
neutral manner and shall not distinguish between participating vision care
providers based on the following characteristics:
(1) Discount or incentive offered by the vision care provider on
services and materials that are not covered by the insurer or vision benefit
manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan;
(2) The dollar amount, volume amount, or percent usage amount of
any material or good purchased by the vision care provider; or
(3) The brand, source, manufacturer, or supplier of a covered
service or covered product utilized by the vision care provider.
(h) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall not advertise that services and materials are
covered with additional copay or coinsurance if the health benefit plan,
vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan does not reimburse the
participating vision care provider for the services or materials in order to
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
claim that services and materials are covered services and materials.
(i) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall not steer enrollees to, or limit the enrollees’
choice of, vision care provider for services or materials that are not
covered services or not covered materials.
(j) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall not incentivize, recommend, encourage, persuade, or
attempt to persuade an enrollee to obtain covered services, noncovered
services, covered materials, or noncovered materials:
(1) At any particular participating vision care provider over
another participating vision care provider;
(2) At a retail establishment owned by, partially owned by,
contracted with, or otherwise affiliated with the insurer, vision benefit
manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan instead of a
different vision care provider; or
(3) At any internet or virtual provider or retailer owned by,
partially owned by, contracted with, or otherwise affiliated with the vision
plan instead of a different participating vision care provider.
(k) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall not reimburse a vision care provider a different
amount for covered services or covered materials because of the vision care
provider’s choice of:
(1) Optical laboratory;
(2) Source of supplier of:
(A) Contact lenses;
(B) Ophthalmic lenses;
(C) Ophthalmic glasses frames; or
(D) Covered services, covered materials, noncovered
services, or noncovered materials;
(3) Equipment used for patient care;
(4) Retail optical affiliation;
(5) Vision support organization;
(6) Group purchasing organization;
(7) Doctor alliance;
(8) Professional trade association membership;
(9) Electronic health record software, electronic medical record
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
software, or practice management software; or
(10) Third-party claim filing service, billing service, or
electronic data interchange clearinghouse company.
(f)(l) The terms, discounts, and reimbursement rates in a
participating contract between an insurer, vision benefit manager, vision
care plan, or vision care discount plan with a vision care provider shall not
be modified during the term of a participating contract absent written
authorization from the vision care provider.
(m) A participating provider agreement between an insurer, vision
benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan and a vision
care provider shall not require a vision care provider to accept a
reimbursement payment in the form of a virtual credit card or any other
payment method wherein a processing fee, administrative fee, percentage
amount, or dollar amount is assessed to the vision care provider to receive a
reimbursement payment.
(n)(1) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall not use extrapolation to complete an audit of a
participating vision care provider.
(2) An additional payment due to a participating vision care
provider or a refund due to the insurer or vision benefit manager shall not
be based on an extrapolation, but shall be based on the actual overpayment or
underpayment, as determined after an investigation by the insurer, vision
benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan, and
participating vision care provider has been afforded, and has exhausted, all
opportunities to appeal the insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care
plan, or vision care discount plan’s findings, as stated in the provider
manual or policy document, or applicable law.
(o)(1) A participating provider agreement between an insurer, vision
benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision care discount plan and a vision
care provider shall not prohibit a vision care provider from accepting a cash
payment option from the enrollee if the cash payment option is less costly to
the enrollee than the total out-of-pocket cost of the service or material.
(2) A vision care provider shall not be subject to an audit for
offering a cash price option for services and materials.
(p) An insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, or vision
care discount plan shall not withhold or recoup a contracted amount for a
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
covered service or covered material provided to an enrollee if the enrollee
is verified to be eligible by the vision care provider through customary
verification methods of the insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care
plan, or vision care discount plan to receive the covered service or covered
material on the date of service.
(g)(q) An optician licensed under the Ophthalmic Dispensing Act, § 17-
89-101 et seq., is subject to:
(1) Subsections (c) and (e)(f) of this section; and
(2) Subsection (b) of this section in regard to materials.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1202(5), concerning the definition of
"health benefit plan" under the Healthcare Contracting Simplification Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(5)(A) "Health benefit plan" means a plan, policy, contract,
certificate, agreement, or other evidence of coverage for healthcare services
offered or issued by a healthcare insurer in this state.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes:
(i) A nonfederal governmental plan as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2023; and January 1, 2025;
(ii) A contract for providing benefits for dental
care pursuant to:
(a) A healthcare insurance policy or
certificate;
(b) A dental-only plan;
(c) A health maintenance organization provider
contract; or
(d) A managed healthcare plan; and
(iii) A contract for providing benefits for vision
care under a healthcare insurance policy or certificate, a vision-only plan,
a health maintenance organization provider contract, or a managed healthcare
plan.
(C) "Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A disability income plan;
(ii) A credit insurance plan;
(iii) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200

HB1353
(iv) A medical payment under automobile or homeowners
insurance plans;
(v) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vi) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(vii) An accident-only plan;
(viii) A specified disease plan; or
(ix) A long-term care only plan; or
(x) A vision-only plan;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1202(7), concerning the definition of
"healthcare insurer" under the Healthcare Contracting Simplification Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(7)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity that is subject to
state insurance regulation and provides health insurance in this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" includes:
(i) An insurance company;
(ii) A health maintenance organization;
(iii) A hospital and medical service corporation;
(iv) A risk-based provider organization;
(v) A sponsor of a nonfederal self-funded
governmental plan; and
(vi) A dental-only plan; and
(vii) A vision-only plan;

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date. This act shall apply to an
insurer, vision benefit manager, vision care plan, and vision discount plan
upon the earlier of:
(1) The period of renewal of an enrollee's current health
benefit plan or issue of a new health benefit plan to an enrollee;
(2) The initiation of a new contract with a vision care provider
or a modification of an existing contract with a vision care provider; or
(3) January 1, 2026.

01/31/2025 12:08:07 PM ANS200